District of Columbia statutes.
47-4804

Recapture.

(a)

The owner of a qualified project eligible for the District of Columbia low-income housing tax credit shall submit a copy of the eligibility statement issued by the Department with respect to the qualified project at the time of filing the project owner’s state tax return. In the case of failure to attach the eligibility statement, a credit under this section shall not be allowed with respect to such qualified project for that year until the copy is provided to the Office of Tax and Revenue.

(b)

If under section 42 of the 1986 Internal Revenue Code, as amended and in effect for the taxable year, a portion of any federal low-income housing tax credits taken on a low-income qualified project is required to be recaptured, the District of Columbia low-income housing tax credit authorized by this chapter with respect to such qualified District of Columbia project shall also be recaptured. The District of Columbia recapture amount shall be equal to the amount of the District of Columbia low-income housing tax credits previously claimed times a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the amount of recaptured federal low-income housing tax credits and the denominator of which shall be the amount of federal low-income housing tax credits previously claimed.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7142(b), 61 DCR 9990